Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.130

Board of directors—Compensation.

Each member of the board of directors of the public facilities district may receive compensation of fifty dollars per day for attending meetings or conferences on behalf of the district, not to exceed three thousand dollars per year. A director may waive all or a portion of his or her compensation under this section as to a month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the public facilities district. The compensation provided in this section is in addition to reimbursement for expenses paid to the directors by the public facilities district.

[ 1995 c 396 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 c 396: See note following RCW 36.100.010.